dev/ortho/lat-cyr.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%{й%}
%{ь%}
%{h%}
%{c%}
%{s%}
%{e%}

LEXICON Root

Punct ;
Exceptions ;
Digits ;
Alpha ;

LEXICON AlphaLoop

Alpha ;
 # ;

LEXICON Digits

<[%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+> # ;

LEXICON Punct

%.:%. # ;
%-:%- # ;
%,:%, # ;
!%,:%، # ;  ! Arabic comma
!،:، # ;
!,:، # ;
%;:%; # ;
%::%: # ;
%!:%! # ;
%?:%? # ;
%“:%“ # ;
%”:%” # ;
%«:%« # ;
%»:%» # ;
%(:%( # ;
%):%) # ;
%–:%– # ;

LEXICON Alpha
f:f AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
i:i AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
l:l AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
oʻ:ö AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
sh:ş AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
u:u AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
aʻ:aʻ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
LEXICON Exceptions
abzats:abza%{c%} AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "абзац"
aviatsiya:avia%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "авиация"
agnostitsizm:agnosti%{c%}izm AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "агностицизм"
akkreditatsiya:akkredita%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "аккредитация"
amortizatsiya:amortiza%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "амортизация"
applikatsiya:applika%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "аппликация"
auksion:auk%{s%}ion AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "аукцион"
botsman:bo%{c%}man AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "боцман"
ventilyatsion:ventilya%{c%}ion AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "вентиляцион"
gallitsizm:galli%{c%}izm AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "галлицизм"
gerbitsidlar:gerbi%{c%}idlar AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "гербицидлар"
giperinflyatsiya:giperinflya%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "гиперинфляция"
gusenitsa:guseni%{c%}a AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "гусеница"
dezinfeksiya:dezinfek%{s%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "дезинфекция"
demarkatsiya:demarka%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "демаркация"
deratizatsiya:deratiza%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "дератизация"
defoliatsiya:defolia%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "дефолиация"
diskriminatsiya:diskrimina%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "дискриминация"
distillyatsiya:distillya%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "дистилляция"
izolyatsion:izolya%{c%}ion AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "изоляцион"
improvizatsiya:improviza%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "импровизация"
inersiya:iner%{s%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "инерция"
instruksiya:instruk%{s%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "инструкция"
internatsionalist:interna%{c%}ionalist AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "интернационалист"
informatsion:informa%{c%}ion AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "информацион"
kanalizatsiya:kanaliza%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "канализация"
kvalifikatsiya:kvalifika%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "квалификация"
koalitsion:koali%{c%}ion AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "коалицион"
kommersiya:kommer%{s%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "коммерция"
konveksiya:konvek%{s%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "конвекция"
konsignatsiya:konsigna%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "консигнация"
konsultatsiya:konsulta%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "консультация"
konferensiya:konferen%{s%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "конференция"
konsentratsiya:kon%{s%}entra%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "концентрация"
konslager:kon%{s%}lager AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "концлагерь"
korrupsiya:korrup%{s%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "коррупция"
laminatsiya:lamina%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "ламинация"
litsey:li%{c%}ey AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "лицей"
marganets:margane%{c%} AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "марганец"
mexanizatsiyalash:mexaniza%{c%}iyalaş AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "механизациялаш"
militsiyaxona:mili%{c%}iyaxona AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "милицияхона"
mototsikl:moto%{c%}ikl AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "мотоцикл"
munitsipalitet:muni%{c%}ipalitet AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "муниципалитет"
nostrifikatsiya:nostrifika%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "нострификация"
operatsiya:opera%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "операция"
osteomalyatsiya:osteomalya%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "остеомаляция"
penitssilin:peni%{c%}%{s%}ilin AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "пениццилин"
platsdarm:pla%{c%}darm AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "плацдарм"
politsiya:poli%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "полиция"
press-konferensiya:press-konferen%{s%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "пресс-конференция"
pritsep:pri%{c%}ep AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "прицеп"
proporsional:propor%{s%}ional AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "пропорционал"
protsessor:pro%{c%}essor AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "процессор"
radiatsion:radia%{c%}ion AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "радиацион"
rafinatsiyalash:rafina%{c%}iyalaş AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "рафинациялаш"
ratsionlallashmoq:ra%{c%}ionlallashmoq AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "рационлаллашмоқ"
reanimatsiya:reanima%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "реанимация"
redaksiya:redak%{s%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "редакция"
reklamatsiya:reklama%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "рекламация"
repetitsiya:repeti%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "репетиция"
retsenziya:re%{c%}enziya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "рецензия"
ritsarlik:ri%{c%}arlik AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "рицарлик"
seleksion:selek%{s%}ion AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "селекцион"
situatsiya:situa%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "ситуация"
sotsializm:so%{c%}ializm AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "социализм"
spetsifik:spe%{c%}ifik AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "специфик"
stronsiy:stron%{s%}iy AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "стронций"
telekommunikatsiya:telekommunika%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "телекоммуникация"
terset:ter%{s%}et AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "терцет"
transliteratsiya:translitera%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "транслитерация"
uborshitsa:uborshi%{c%}a AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "уборшица"
farmatsevt:farma%{c%}evt AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "фармацевт"
formatsiya:forma%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "формация"
frits:fri%{c%} AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "фриц"
seziy:%{s%}eziy AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "цезий"
senz:%{s%}enz AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "ценз"
sentrizm:%{s%}entrizm AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "центризм"
sivilizatsiya:%{s%}iviliza%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "цивилизация"
silindr:%{s%}ilindr AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "цилиндр"
sirkoniy:%{s%}irkoniy AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "цирконий"
sitata:%{s%}itata AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "цитата"
siferblat:%{s%}iferblat AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "циферблат"
shprits:shpri%{c%} AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "шприц"
ekspeditsiya:ekspedi%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "экспедиция"
elektrifikatsiya:elektrifika%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "электрификация"
ensefalit:en%{s%}efalit AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "энцефалит"
eruditsiya:erudi%{c%}iya AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "эрудиция"
bugun-erta:bugun-%{e%}rta AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "бугун-эрта"
sutemizuvchilar:sut%{e%}mizuvchilar AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "сутэмизувчилар"
yoga:%{й%}oga AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "йога"
rayon:ra%{й%}on AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "район"
pleyer:ple%{й%}er AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "плейер"
albatros:al%{ь%}batros AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "альбатрос"
aprel:aprel%{ь%} AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "апрель"
banderol:banderol%{ь%} AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "бандероль"
broneavtomobil:broneavtomobil%{ь%} AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "бронеавтомобиль"
veksel:veksel%{ь%} AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "вексель"
voltmetr:vol%{ь%}tmetr AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "вольтметр"
geraldika:geral%{ь%}dika AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "геральдика"
delfinsimonlar:del%{ь%}finsimonlar AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "дельфинсимонлар"
italyanlar:ital%{ь%}yanlar AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "итальянлар"
kartech:kartech%{ь%} AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "картечь"
kompyuterlashtirmoq:komp%{ь%}yuterlashtirmoq AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "компьютерлаштирмоқ"
krovat:krovat AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "кровать"
medalon:medal%{ь%}on AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "медальон"
multiplikatsion:mul%{ь%}tiplikatsion AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "мультипликацион"
pavilon:pavil%{ь%}on AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "павильон"
plastir:plastir%{ь%} AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "пластирь"
pulpit:pul%{ь%}pit AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "пульпит"
ritsar:ri%{c%}ar%{ь%} AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "рицарь"
siren:siren%{ь%} AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "сирень"
talk:tal%{ь%}k AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "тальк"
ultraqisqa:ul%{ь%}traqisqa AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "ультрақисқа"
fizkulturachi:fizkul%{ь%}turaçi AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "физкультурачи"
fonar:fonar%{ь%} AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "фонарь"
shpindel:shpindel%{ь%} AlphaLoop "weight: 0.0" ; ! "шпиндель"
